Utah statutes.
76-3-101.   Sentencing in accordance with chapter.

(1) A person adjudged guilty of an offense under this code shall be sentenced in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(2)  Penal laws enacted after the effective date of this code shall be classified for sentencing purposes in accordance with this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

